Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 4 Foreign Guardian

29-2-74.
“Foreign guardian” defined; required filings; bond.

For purposes of this part, the term “foreign guardian” means a guardian or other person who has been given responsibility by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or territory governed by the Constitution of the United States for the care of a minor and whose guardianship has not been transferred to and accepted in this state pursuant to the provisions of Part 2 of this article.

Any foreign guardian of a minor who resides in any other state and who is authorized to sell and convey property of the minor may sell property of the minor which is in this state, under the rules and regulations prescribed for the sale of real estate by conservators of this state, provided that the foreign guardian must file and have recorded in the court or other proper court, at the time of petitioning for sale, an authenticated copy of the letters of appointment as guardian of a minor and must also file with the court or other proper authority bond with good and sufficient security in double the value of the property to be sold for the faithful execution of the guardianship as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-75.
Right of foreign guardian to bring action to enforce rights of minor.

A foreign guardian may institute an action in any court in this state to enforce any right or to recover any property belonging to the minor or accruing to the foreign guardian as such.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-76.
Filing of authenticated copy of letters of guardianship.

Pending an action brought by a foreign guardian pursuant to Code Section 29-2-75, an authenticated copy of the letters of guardianship shall be filed with the clerk of the court to become a part of the record, if the case is pending in a court of record, or filed with the papers if the action is a summary proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-77.
Submission to jurisdiction by foreign guardian.

A foreign guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the guardianship by:

In this state receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property belonging to the minor; or

Doing any act as a guardian in this state that would have given this state jurisdiction over the actor as an individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.